dictionaries/cy_GB.aff
SFX O   d           set        d
SFX O   d           sai        d
SFX O   d           sai'i      d
SFX O   d           sai'u      d
SFX O   d           sai'ch     d
SFX O   d           sai'n      d
SFX O   d           sai'r      d
SFX O   d           sem        d
SFX O   d           sech       d
SFX O   d           sent       d
SFX O   d           sid        d
SFX O   d           ed         d
SFX O   d           wyf        d
SFX O   d           ych        d
SFX O   d           o          d
SFX O   d           o'i        d
SFX O   d           o'u        d
SFX O   d           o'ch       d
SFX O   d           o'n        d
SFX O   d           o'r        d
SFX O   d           om         d
SFX O   d           och        d
SFX O   d           ont        d
SFX O   d           er         d
SFX O   d           es         d
SFX O   d           est        d
SFX O   d           ith        d
SFX O   d           iff        d
SFX O   d           on         d
SFX O   d           an         d
SFX O   ed          af         ed
SFX O   ed          i          ed
SFX O   ed          i'i        ed
SFX O   ed          i'u        ed
SFX O   ed          i'ch       ed
SFX O   ed          i'n        ed
SFX O   ed          i'r        ed
SFX O   ed          a          ed
SFX O   ed          a'i        ed
SFX O   ed          a'u        ed
SFX O   ed          a'ch       ed
SFX O   ed          a'n        ed
SFX O   ed          a'r        ed
SFX O   ed          wn         ed
SFX O   ed          wch        ed
SFX O   ed          ant        ed
SFX O   ed          ir         ed
SFX O   ed          it         ed
SFX O   ed          et         ed
SFX O   ed          ai         ed
SFX O   ed          ai'i       ed
SFX O   ed          ai'u       ed
SFX O   ed          ai'ch      ed
SFX O   ed          ai'n       ed
SFX O   ed          ai'r       ed
SFX O   ed          em         ed
SFX O   ed          ech        ed
SFX O   ed          ent        ed
SFX O   ed          id         ed
SFX O   ed          ais        ed
SFX O   ed          aist       ed
SFX O   ed          odd        ed
SFX O   ed          som        ed
SFX O   ed          soch       ed
SFX O   ed          sant       ed
SFX O   ed          wyd        ed
SFX O   ed          swn        ed
SFX O   ed          sit        ed
SFX O   ed          set        ed
SFX O   ed          sai        ed
SFX O   ed          sai'i      ed
SFX O   ed          sai'u      ed
SFX O   ed          sai'ch     ed
SFX O   ed          sai'n      ed
SFX O   ed          sai'r      ed
SFX O   ed          sem        ed
SFX O   ed          sech       ed
SFX O   ed          sent       ed
SFX O   ed          sid        ed
SFX O   ed          ed         ed
SFX O   ed          wyf        ed
SFX O   ed          ych        ed
SFX O   ed          o          ed
SFX O   ed          o'i        ed
SFX O   ed          o'u        ed
SFX O   ed          o'ch       ed
SFX O   ed          o'n        ed
SFX O   ed          o'r        ed
SFX O   ed          om         ed
SFX O   ed          och        ed
SFX O   ed          ont        ed
SFX O   ed          er         ed
SFX O   ed          es         ed
SFX O   ed          est        ed
SFX O   ed          ith        ed
SFX O   ed          iff        ed
SFX O   ed          on         ed
SFX O   ed          an         ed
SFX O   yd          af         yd
SFX O   yd          i          yd
SFX O   yd          i'i        yd
SFX O   yd          i'u        yd
SFX O   yd          i'ch       yd
SFX O   yd          i'n        yd
SFX O   yd          i'r        yd
SFX O   yd          a          yd
SFX O   yd          a'i        yd
SFX O   yd          a'u        yd
SFX O   yd          a'ch       yd
SFX O   yd          a'n        yd
SFX O   yd          a'r        yd
SFX O   yd          wn         yd
SFX O   yd          wch        yd
SFX O   yd          ant        yd
SFX O   yd          ir         yd
SFX O   yd          it         yd
SFX O   yd          et         yd
SFX O   yd          ai         yd
SFX O   yd          ai'i       yd
SFX O   yd          ai'u       yd
SFX O   yd          ai'ch      yd
SFX O   yd          ai'n       yd
SFX O   yd          ai'r       yd
SFX O   yd          em         yd
SFX O   yd          ech        yd
SFX O   yd          ent        yd
SFX O   yd          id         yd
SFX O   yd          ais        yd
SFX O   yd          aist       yd
SFX O   yd          odd        yd
SFX O   yd          som        yd
SFX O   yd          soch       yd
SFX O   yd          sant       yd
SFX O   yd          wyd        yd
SFX O   yd          swn        yd
SFX O   yd          sit        yd
SFX O   yd          set        yd
SFX O   yd          sai        yd
SFX O   yd          sai'i      yd
SFX O   yd          sai'u      yd
SFX O   yd          sai'ch     yd
SFX O   yd          sai'n      yd
SFX O   yd          sai'r      yd
SFX O   yd          sem        yd
SFX O   yd          sech       yd
SFX O   yd          sent       yd
SFX O   yd          sid        yd
SFX O   yd          ed         yd
SFX O   yd          wyf        yd
SFX O   yd          ych        yd
SFX O   yd          o          yd
SFX O   yd          o'i        yd
SFX O   yd          o'u        yd
SFX O   yd          o'ch       yd
SFX O   yd          o'n        yd
SFX O   yd          o'r        yd
SFX O   yd          om         yd
SFX O   yd          och        yd
SFX O   yd          ont        yd
SFX O   yd          er         yd
SFX O   yd          es         yd
SFX O   yd          est        yd
SFX O   yd          ith        yd
SFX O   yd          iff        yd
SFX O   yd          on         yd
SFX O   yd          an         yd

SFX N Y 2
SFX N   0           'r         .
SFX N   0           'n         .

SFX Q Y 5
SFX Q   0           'r         .
SFX Q   0           'n         .
SFX Q   0           'ch        .
SFX Q   0           'u         .
SFX Q   0           'i         .

SFX R Y 1
SFX R   0           oedd       .

SFX S Y 6
SFX S   0           au         .
SFX S   0           au'i       .
SFX S   0           au'u       .
SFX S   0           au'ch      .
SFX S   0           au'n       .
SFX S   0           au'r       .

SFX U Y 1
SFX U   0           aidd       .

SFX V Y 1
SFX V   0           ion        .

SFX W Y 1
SFX W   0           iaeth      .
REP 79
REP ax â
REP ex ê
REP ix î
REP ox ô
REP ux û
REP wx ŵ
REP yx ŷ
REP ol ôl
REP ty tŷ
REP io ïo
REP ea aea
REP en em
REP eu ae
REP ae eu
REP e au
REP ei a
REP a ei
REP y ai
REP au heu
REP iff a
REP ai e
REP e ai
REP s ys
REP ' f
REP ir ys
REP i au
REP ' s
REP m rn
REP ph ff
REP m ym
REP x cs
REP io u
REP u io
REP ur u'r
REP ir i'r
REP 'l el
REP afon awsom
REP u iw
REP roa roesa
REP y -y-
REP o aw
REP ei a
REP m ym
REP j si
REP ch ts
REP oe wy
REP s eis
REP rn m
REP bydd bu
REP fydd fu
REP u we
REP dio deuo
REP a ef
REP ad aid
REP ad iaid
REP dyla dylai
REP og us
REP us og
REP ol us
REP us ol
REP og ol
REP ol og
REP n ng
REP g ng
REP rn m
REP rn nn
REP we weu
REP dwe dywe
REP d'w dyw
REP d'w diw
REP son asom
REP son om
REP ad ail
REP ail ad
REP 1 i
REP 1 l
REP 0 o
REP 6 ô
REP 6 o
