dictionaries/cy_GB.dic
gofadeiladau/N
garola/ANQ
bliwtocrat/W
cyff/LTV
fru/NR
blestri/NQ
treialu/ALNQ
gonswl/W
filwr/UVW
ffrâmgell/R
rhagboethi/NQ
cigysol/LTV
lyfrwertha/ANQ
operonau/N
ddarlith/RV
f'Otoman/U
hundod/UW
cantio/LNQT
his-weinidog/V
gigfa/NR
cyfreithlon/LTW
cyweirio/LNQT
gydgyfarfyddo/NQ
brydydd/UVW
hymledydd/V
nghydfwriadu/NQ
waethafydd/HMVW
hymgyffelybu/ANQ
crwydr/LTU
nhyrfa/NR
nghyfrifo/NQ
llech/V
lwyfandir/R
frychai/NQ
nac/S
f'weddw/U
dyheadau/NT
cynulleidfa/LNRT
wahodd/HMV
stondin/W
ddifagneteiddio/NQ
llawryf/R
Beibl/TU
ddoe/N
ddof/V
gyd-wau/NQ
forfilltir/R
llesg/S
barnwr/TW
d'Iago/U
gorffwysfa/NRT
lwythydd/V
hunffurf/W
ffansïai/NQ
goedlannau/N
maethle/NR
anymatal/HPW
ailgwympa/ANPQ
lygod/U
crynfyd/LRT
bywgraffydd/TV
ddeon/W
longddryllio/NQ
hegnïasai/NQ
sector/U
milodfa/NR
rhaglun/VW
deieli/NQ
byth/R
gel/TU
rhaglyw/NW
hymwrendi/NQ
ganmol/W
holinydd/V
f'wernlle/R
folasai/NQ
gnu/NR
potelai/LNQ
heclectig/VW
Dartar/U
wrea/N
bras/ST
gyflinydd/V
nghorffoli/NQ
bietist/UW
gul/UV
da/NRT
ffug-weithrediadau/N
brin/V
hymlygra/ANQ
racem/U
gylch/RV
hofergoel/VW
rhigol/U
tunio/LNQT
hoel/V
cyfnosau/LNT
iach/S
mastgell/R
lleban/U
ganŵna/NQ
blŷg/V
gwrol/TW
gydgyfranoga/ANQ
parcha/ALNQ
corstir/LRT
gyffes/V
resymol/W
hymgolla/ANQ
halen/U
ddiddan/V
cymhello/LNQ
f'wawr/R
llyfrgellydd/W
fiobrofa/ANQ
Twrc/LTU
defnyddiol/TW
cenhado/LNQ
dadafaeliadau/NT
ymson/V
gyffredinol/VW
gamfeddyli/DNQ
ddrymlin/R
ddewin/VW
ceryntau/LNT
fandada/ANQ
ddidduw/NW
claf/LTU
ganfuasai/NQ
fewngylch/R
iambig/HV
groga/ANQ
penllywydd/LTVW
merwi/NQ
Groeg/TU
anfonog/HPV
gytir/R
penrhynau/LNT
unigolydd/HVW
hep/V
hoptimist/UW
frodor/VW
dadstartsio/NQT
cydwedd/LTV
Iago/NU
f'yrfa/R
mastiau/N
hatal/VW
goeg/V
dymuna/ANQ
metropolitan/U
binomialau/NT
rigorydd/V
broffwydol/W
cwango/LNTU
drist/S
hehangylch/R
plwyfol/LTV
llamddelw/N
egnïasai/NQ
dewini/ADNQU
adfyddin/HPR
periglor/LTVW
orthodeintydd/HV
diffiniadau/NT
Fedwyn/U
archdderwydd/HPW
creigle/LNRT
fargenasai/NQ
gofid/TV
Seion/UW
Brython/TU
cyfaddasa/ALNQ
cnôi/LNQ
drontol/V
gyfanfyd/R
cydraddol/LTVW
per/LTU
bortamenti/N
blod/V
hepil/RVW
fesoderm/U
fendiga/ANQ
f'orseddfa/R
gwac/S
camdriniaethau/LNT
gyfunol/W
ymofyn/HV
lyngyr/U
gwir/RV
lawdrin/W
fydru/ANQ
goncoidau/N
gontract/V
dirgel/TUV
gwpl/S
befr/V
uwchbridd/HR
brychasai/NQ
telyneg/LTVW
fysgu/ANQ
llin/U
benllywydd/VW
Bentecostal/U
flaenfyddin/R
fiola/N
diryw/NVW
imp/V
faban/U
heili/NQ
llun/VW
gyfanheddle/NR
d'war/U
borthellu/NQ
rinc/V
rhewlif/R
nghrynodebu/NQ
boblog/U
addewid/HPV
fwntiau/N
gwirfoddol/TW
bas/UV
salmydd/VW
derwydd/TW
blatio/NQ
sgroliau/N
obeithlu/NR
lafarog/V
optimist/HUW
achos/HPVW
bot/V
gorganau/N
lesg/S
hanai/NQ
rhagorsaf/R
gyfrifydd/VW
hesgob/UV
bur/TV
felanganau/N
hesgus/V
goffaol/W
maetha/ANQ
glerc/UV
hedeugell/R
bersonol/W
deledydd/V
winga/AMNQ
metel/RU
aeaf/HMRU
cyffredinol/LTVW
llanastra/ANQ
weddw/NU
drwyddedog/V
nhrigo/NQ
gefnder/R
biwrocrat/TUW
drosydd/V
gyfarcha/ANQ
gaeaf/RTU
democratiaethau/NT
asgetig/HPVW
fyfyrgell/R
ganiedydd/V
llechwr/U
treisi/DLNQ
nghydariannu/NQ
caethwas/LTW
cnud/LRT
drosblyg/V
hiachawdwr/W
ddadl/S
rhagdaro/NQ
gyfarweini/DNQ
peilot-swyddog/LTV
hormon/U
grychdir/R
gwrthddadl/ST
clerwr/LTUW
frown/U
berocsidau/N
ddwys/SV
distryw/NV
hyfforddi/NQ
cad/LRT
f'antur/W
drifft/V
chwerwo/NQ
Lladin/U
niryw/NW
flaenoriaethu/ANQ
bergwynt/RT
hystor/U
sglerencyma/N
ddolbridd/R
ddawns/V
clerc/LUV
craffu/ALNQ
hystyr/VW
regurau/N
Pwyl/LTU
dadleuwr/TW
bwydgell/RT
brwmstan/TU
rhyddfrydoli/NQ
datawyru/NQT
ben-glin/V
gwaethafydd/TVW
hintegrandau/N
blwtocrat/W
hallgylchu/NQ
rym/R
ffwndamentalydd/V
capsiwl/LTU
gobennau/NT
dadl/ST
delegraff/W
ddethola/ANQ
tarth/LRT
copr/LTU
hisadrannau/N
hyfforddedig/V
dwys/STV
Owen/UW
arlywydd/HPVW
rhodianna/NQ
cofgell/LRT
dato/N
brown/TU
troseddlu/LNRT
gyferthi/NQ
cyanadau/LNT
drawsnewid/V
rewgell/R
Fensiefig/U
haprifau/N
cydgordio/LNQT
dec/S
horgan/U
partisan/LTW
iseldir/HR
gychwynnydd/V
bolyomino/N
Alban/U
gambro/NQ
dri/RU
hymdeithydd/V
gryngylchau/N
gyffindir/R
unigol/HVW
fysu/ANQ
cwpl/LST
hestron/UW
cuddlenni/LNT
canrif/LRT
melfed/U
allddod/HPV
cyfalaf/LTW
dargopïo/NQT
deisyfiadau/NT
Jacobin/UW
fras/S
brifddinas/R
syn/V
ystum/VW
ddemocrat/UW
haddysgu/ANQ
calibra/ALNQ
sychdir/R
hoedran/W
cydgyfrannog/LTV
dywarchu/ANQ
trist/LST
pyramid/LTU
dadluddedu/ANQ
ddeheuwynt/R
llesgao/NQ
gloff/V
gyfrin/VW
f'ehedfa/R
cynhaeafu/LNQT
sibryda/ANQ
mawn/U
bwmp/V
wefusoli/NQ
gyfeirgylch/R
cyd-wea/ALNQ
siofinydd/VW
flodeusai/NQ
gilwynt/R
hystyri/DNQ
penyd/LVW
baglor/TVW
efengyl/HUW
gwarth/ST
chwardda/ANQ
wrthddadlei/MNQ
marwfis/R
osodydd/HMV
canon/LTUW
mwtagenau/N
tio/LNQT
tir/LRTV
gapsiwl/U
datrysiadau/NT
facrogydosodydd/V
tri/LRTU
braich-neidio/NQT
unigryw/NW
dyfodol/TUW
tatio/LNQT
ragdyb/VW
f'arddangosle/R
camsefi/LNQ
rosedi/N
lyfrydd/VW
cloch/LTU
hiach/S
wynfa/NR
nocio/MNQ
hail-luniadau/N
flodig/V
Folsiefig/U
gamweithred/R
coetgae/LNT
aflechi/MNQ
drin/VW
deheudir/RT
flin/V
cydgrynhôi/LNQ
longiad/S
llongiad/S
rhechu/ANQ
fab/UW
hargrafflenni/N
lythyrgludydd/V
Grynydd/W
fil/RV
